California statutes. Corporations Code
(B) A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

(3) “Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner or to the partner’s transferee.

(4) “Electronic transmission by the partnership” means a communication (a) delivered by (1) facsimile telecommunication or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, for that recipient on record with the partnership, (2) posting on an electronic message board or network that the partnership has designated for those communications, together with a separate notice to the recipient of the posting, which transmission shall be validly delivered upon the later of the posting or delivery of the separate notice thereof, or (3) other means of electronic communication, (b) to a recipient who has provided an unrevoked consent
 to the use of those means of transmission, and (c) that creates a record that is capable of retention, retrieval, and review, and that may thereafter be rendered
 into clearly legible tangible form. However, an electronic transmission by a partnership to an individual partner is not authorized unless, in addition to satisfying the requirements of this section, the transmission satisfies the requirements applicable to consumer consent to electronic records as set forth in the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)(1)).

(5) “Electronic transmission to the partnership” means a communication (a) delivered by (1) facsimile telecommunication or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, which the partnership has provided from time to time to partners for sending communications to the partnership, (2) posting on an electronic message board or network that the partnership has designated for
 those communications, and which transmission shall be validly delivered upon the posting, or (3) other means of electronic communication, (b) as to which the partnership has placed in effect reasonable measures to verify that the sender is the partner, in person or by proxy, purporting to send the transmission, and (c) that creates a record that is capable of retention, retrieval, and review, and that may thereafter be rendered into clearly legible tangible form.

(6) (A) “Foreign limited liability partnership” means a partnership, other than a limited partnership, formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of another jurisdiction and denominated or registered as a limited liability partnership or registered limited liability partnership under the laws of that jurisdiction (i) in which each partner is a licensed
 person or a person licensed or authorized to provide professional limited liability partnership services in a jurisdiction or jurisdictions other than this state, (ii) which is licensed under the laws of the state to engage in the practice of public accountancy or the practice of law, or (iii) which (I) is related to a registered limited liability partnership that practices public accountancy or, to the extent permitted by the State Bar of California, practices law or is related to a foreign limited liability partnership and (II) provides services related or complementary to the professional limited liability partnership services provided by, or provides services or facilities to, that registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

(B) For the purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A), a partnership
 is related to a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership if (i) at least a majority of the partners in one partnership are also partners in the other partnership, or (ii) at least a majority in interest in each partnership hold interests in or are members of another person, except an
 individual, and each partnership renders services pursuant to an agreement with that other person, or (iii) one partnership, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other partnership.

(7) “Licensed person” means any person who is duly licensed, authorized, or registered under the provisions of the Business and Professions Code to provide professional limited liability partnership services or who is lawfully able to render professional limited liability partnership services in this state.

(8) (A) “Registered limited liability partnership” means a partnership, other than a limited partnership, formed pursuant to an agreement governed by Article 10 (commencing with
 Section 16951), that is registered under Section 16953 and (i) each of the partners of which is a licensed person or a person licensed or authorized to provide professional limited liability partnership services in a jurisdiction or jurisdictions other than this state, (ii) is licensed under the laws of the state to engage in the practice of public accountancy or the practice of law, or (iii)(I) is related to a registered limited liability partnership that practices public accountancy or, to the extent permitted by the State Bar of California, practices law or is related to a foreign limited liability partnership and (II) provides services related or complementary to the professional limited liability partnership services provided by, or provides services or facilities to, that registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

(B) For the purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A), a partnership is related to a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership if (i) at least a majority of the partners in one partnership are also partners in the other partnership, or (ii) at least a majority in interest in each partnership hold interests in or are members of another person, other than an individual, and each partnership renders services pursuant to an agreement with that other person, or (iii) one partnership, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other partnership.

(9) “Partnership” means an association of two or more persons to carry on as coowners a business for profit formed under Section 16202, predecessor law, or comparable law
 of another jurisdiction, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of this state, a registered limited liability partnership, and excludes any partnership formed under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 15900).

(10) “Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership, including amendments to the partnership agreement.

(11) “Partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking.

(12) “Partnership interest” or “partner’s interest in the partnership” means all of a partner’s interests in the partnership, including the
 partner’s transferable interest and all management and other rights.

(13) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(14) “Professional limited liability partnership services” means the practice of public accountancy or the practice of law.

(15) “Property” means all property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein.

(16) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
 the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(17) “Statement” means a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303, a statement of denial under Section 16304, a statement of dissociation under Section 16704, a statement of dissolution under Section 16805, a statement of conversion or a certificate of conversion under Section 16906, a statement of merger under Section 16915, or an amendment or cancellation of any of the foregoing.

(18) “Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2034.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 34) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 10.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Section operative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16102.

(a) A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

(b) A person has notice of a fact if any of the following apply:

(1) The person knows of it.

(2) The person has received a notification of it.

(3) The person has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question.

(4) Subdivision (f) of Section 16953 or subdivision (f) of Section 16959 as applicable.

(c) A person notifies or gives a notification to another by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person knows of it.

(d) A person receives a notification when either of the following apply:

(1) The person knows of the notification.

(2) The notification is duly delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

(f) A partner’s knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16103.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership are governed by the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

(b) The partnership agreement may not do any of the following:

(1) Vary the rights and duties under Section 16105 except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all of the partners.

(2) Unreasonably restrict the right of access to books and records under subdivision (b) of Section 16403, or the right to be furnished with information under subdivision (c) of Section 16403.

(3) Eliminate the duty of loyalty under subdivision (b) of Section 16404 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16603, but, if not manifestly unreasonable, may do either of the following:

(A) The partnership agreement may identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty.

(B) All of the partners or a number or percentage specified in the partnership agreement may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty.

(4) Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under subdivision (c) of Section 16404 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16603.

(5) Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subdivision (d) of Section 16404, but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

(6) Vary the power to dissociate as a partner under subdivision (a) Section 16602, except to require the notice under paragraph (1) of Section 16601 to be in writing.

(7) Vary the right of a court to expel a partner in the events specified in paragraph (5) of Section 16601.

(8) Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases specified in paragraph (4), (5), or (6) of Section 16801.

(9) Restrict rights of third parties under this chapter.

(10) Vary the law applicable to a registered limited liability partnership under subdivision (b) of Section 16106.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16104.

(a) Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

(b) If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in Section 3289 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16105.

(a) A statement may be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in this state.

(b) A certified copy of a statement that has been filed in the office of the Secretary of State and recorded in the office for recording transfers of real property has the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter. A recorded statement that is not a certified copy of a statement filed in the office
 of the Secretary of State does not have the effect provided for recorded
 statements in this chapter.

(c) A statement filed by a partnership shall be executed by at least two partners. Other statements shall be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person named as a partner in a statement shall personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.

(d) A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

(e) A person who files a statement pursuant to
 this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

(f) The Secretary of State may collect a fee for filing or providing a certified copy of a statement. The officer responsible for recording transfers of real property may collect a fee for recording a statement.

(g) The Secretary of State may cancel a statement, including a statement effecting a conversion, if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not
 been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give a first written notice of the applicability of the section to the partners, or the appointed agent, or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent, the Secretary of State shall give a second written notice of cancellation and the cancellation shall thereupon be effective. The second notice shall be given 20 days or more after the first notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 100.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16106.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this section, or Section 16958, the law of the jurisdiction in which a partnership has its principal office governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

(b) With respect to a registered limited liability partnership, the law of this state shall govern relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership, and the liability of partners for obligations of the partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 101.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16107.

A partnership governed by this chapter is subject to any amendment to or repeal of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16108.

Except with respect to the provisions of this chapter specifically relating to registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships, this chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16109.

The rights and duties of surviving partners, the legal representatives of deceased partners, the creditors of such partners, and the creditors of the partnership created by or defined in this chapter shall be given full force and effect notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of the Probate Code, but nothing in this chapter shall otherwise affect any provision of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16110.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16111.

(a) Except as provided in Section 16955.5, before January 1, 1999, this chapter governs only a partnership formed (1) on or after the effective date of this chapter, unless that partnership is continuing the business of a dissolved partnership under Section 15041, or (2) before the effective date of this chapter if that partnership elects, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter.

(b) On and after January 1, 1999, this chapter governs all partnerships.

(c) Except with respect to the provisions of this chapter specifically relating to registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships, the provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one year preceding the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter, only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16112.

This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before this chapter takes effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16113.

(a) The fee for filing a statement of partnership is seventy dollars ($70).

(b) Unless another fee is specified by law or the law specifies that no fee is to be charged, the fee for filing any partnership statement pursuant to this chapter is thirty dollars ($30).

(c) There is no fee for filing a statement of dissolution for the purposes of canceling a statement of partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16114.

Unless another fee is specified by law or the law specifies that no fee is to be charged, the fee for acceptance of copies of process against a surviving foreign partnership or limited partnership pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16906 is fifty dollars ($50) for each surviving foreign partnership or limited partnership general partnership upon whom service is sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nature of Partnership [16201. - 16204.]

16201.

A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16202.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the association of two or more persons to carry on as coowners a business for profit forms a partnership, whether or not the persons intend to form a partnership.

(b) An association formed under a statute other than this chapter, a predecessor statute, or a comparable statute of another jurisdiction is not a partnership under this chapter.

(c) In determining whether a partnership is formed, the following rules apply:

(1) Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the coowners share profits made by the use of the property.

(2) The sharing of gross returns does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in property from which the returns are derived.

(3) A person who receives a share of the profits of a business is presumed to be a partner in the business, unless the profits were received for any of the following reasons:

(A) In payment of a debt by installments or otherwise.

(B) In payment for services as an independent contractor or of wages or other compensation to an employee.

(C) In payment of rent.

(D) In payment of an annuity or other retirement benefit to a beneficiary, representative, or designee of a deceased or retired partner.

(E) In payment of interest or other charge on a loan, even if the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business, including a direct or indirect present or future ownership of the collateral, or rights to income, proceeds, or increase in value derived from the collateral.

(F) In payment for the sale of the goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16203.

Property acquired by a partnership is property of the partnership and not of the partners individually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16204.

(a) Property is partnership property if acquired in the name of either of the following:

(1) The partnership.

(2) One or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership but without an indication of the name of the partnership.

(b) Property is acquired in the name of the partnership by a transfer to either of the following:

(1) The partnership in its name.

(2) One or more partners in their capacity as partners in the partnership, if the name of the partnership is indicated in the instrument transferring title to the property.

(c) Property is presumed to be partnership property if purchased with partnership assets, even if not acquired in the name of the partnership or of one or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership.

(d) Property acquired in the name of one or more of the partners, without an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership and without use of partnership assets, is presumed to be separate property, even if used for partnership purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Relations of Partners to Persons Dealing with Partnership [16301. - 16310.]

16301.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303 both of the following apply:

(1) Each partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business. An act of a partner, including the execution of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership, unless the partner had no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom the partner was dealing knew or had received a notification that the partner lacked authority.

(2) An act of a partner that is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership only if the act was authorized by the other partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16302.

(a) Partnership property may be transferred as follows:

(1) Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303, partnership property held in the name of the partnership may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by a partner in the partnership name.

(2) Partnership property held in the name of one or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, but without an indication of the name of the partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held.

(3) Partnership property held in the name of one or more persons other than the partnership, without an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held.

(b) A partnership may recover partnership property from a transferee only if it proves that execution of the instrument of initial transfer did not bind the partnership under Section 16301 and either of the following applies:

(1) As to a subsequent transferee who gave value for property transferred under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), proves that the subsequent transferee knew or had received a notification that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

(2) As to a transferee who gave value for property transferred under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), proves that the transferee knew or had received a notification that the property was partnership property and that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

(c) A partnership may not recover partnership property from a subsequent transferee if the partnership would not have been entitled to recover the property, under subdivision (b), from any earlier transferee of the property.

(d) If a person holds all of the partners’ interests in the partnership, all of the partnership property vests in that person. The person may execute a document in the name of the partnership to evidence vesting of the property in that person and may file or record the document.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16303.

(a) A partnership may file a statement of partnership authority, which is subject to all of the following:

(1) The statement shall include all of the following:

(A) The name of the partnership.

(B) The street address of its principal office and of one principal office in California, if there is one.

(C) The mailing address of its principal office, if different from the street addresses specified pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(D) The names and
 mailing addresses of all of the partners or of an agent appointed and maintained by the partnership for the purpose of subdivision (b).

(E) The names of the partners authorized to execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership.

(2) The statement may specify the authority, or limitations on the authority, of some or all of the partners to enter into other transactions on behalf of the partnership and any other matter.

(b) If a statement of partnership authority names an agent, the agent shall maintain a list of the names and mailing addresses of all of the partners and make it available to any person on request for good cause shown.

(c) If a filed statement of partnership authority is executed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16105 and states the name of the partnership but does not contain all of the other information required by subdivision (a), the statement nevertheless operates with respect to a person not a partner as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e).

(d) A filed statement of partnership authority supplements the authority of a partner to enter into transactions on behalf of the partnership as follows:

(1) Except for transfers of real property, a grant of authority contained in a filed statement of partnership authority is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a limitation on that authority is not
 then contained in another filed statement. A filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

(2) A grant of authority to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership contained in a certified copy of a filed statement of partnership authority recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a certified copy of a filed statement containing a limitation on that authority is not then of record in the office for recording transfers of that real property. The recording in the office for recording transfers of that real property of a certified copy of a filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

(e) A person not a partner is deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership if a certified copy of the filed statement containing the limitation on authority is of record in the office for recording transfers of that real property.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (d) and (e) and Sections 16704 and 16805, a person not a partner is not deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner merely because the limitation is contained in a filed statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 102.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16304.

A partner or other person named as a partner in a filed statement of partnership authority or in a list maintained by an agent pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16303 may file a statement of denial stating the name of the partnership as filed with the Secretary of State, any identification number issued by the Secretary of State, and the fact that is being denied, that may include denial of a person’s authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial is a limitation on authority as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 16303.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16305.

(a) A partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a partner acting in the ordinary course of business of the partnership or with authority of the partnership.

(b) If, in the course of the partnership’s business or while acting with authority of the partnership, a partner receives or causes the partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a partner, the partnership is liable for the loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16306.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), all partners are liable jointly and severally for all obligations of the partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

(b) A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is not personally liable for any partnership obligation incurred before the person’s admission as a partner.

(c) Notwithstanding any other section of this chapter, and subject to subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (h), a partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not liable or accountable, directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution, assessment, or otherwise, for debts, obligations, or liabilities of or chargeable to the partnership or another partner in the partnership, whether arising in tort, contract, or otherwise, that are incurred, created, or assumed by the partnership while the partnership is a registered limited liability partnership, by reason of being a partner or acting in the conduct of the business or activities of the partnership.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), all or certain specified partners of a registered limited liability partnership, if the specified partners agree, may be liable in their capacity as partners for all or specified debts, obligations, or liabilities of the registered limited liability partnership if the partners possessing a majority of the interests of the partners in the current profits of the partnership, or a different vote as may be required in the partnership agreement, specifically agreed to the specified debts, obligations, or liabilities in writing, prior to the debt, obligation, or liability being incurred. That specific agreement may be modified or revoked if the partners possessing a majority of the interests of the partners in the current profits of the partnership, or a different vote as may be required in the partnership agreement, agree to the modification or revocation in writing; provided, however, that a modification or revocation shall not affect the liability of a partner for any debts, obligations, or liabilities of a registered limited liability partnership incurred, created, or assumed by the registered limited liability partnership prior to the modification or revocation.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (c) shall be construed to affect the liability of a partner of a registered limited liability partnership to third parties for that partner’s tortious conduct.

(f) The limitation of liability in subdivision (c) shall not apply to claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the rendering of professional limited liability partnership services of a registered limited liability partnership providing legal services unless that partnership has a currently effective certificate of registration issued by the State Bar.

(g) A partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a registered limited liability partnership in which personal liability for partnership debts, obligations, or liabilities is asserted against the partner, unless that partner is personally liable under subdivision (d) or (e).

(h) Nothing in this section shall affect or impair the ability of a partner to act as a guarantor or surety for, provide collateral for or otherwise be liable for, the debts, obligations, or liabilities of a registered limited liability partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16307.

(a) A partnership may sue and be sued in the name of the partnership.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g) of Section 16306, an action may be brought against the partnership and any or all of the partners in the same action or in separate actions.

(c) A judgment against a partnership is not by itself a judgment against a partner. A judgment against a partnership may not be satisfied from a partner’s assets unless there is also a judgment against the partner.

(d) A judgment creditor of a partner may not levy execution against the assets of the partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the partnership unless any of the following apply:

(1) A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part.

(2) The partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy.

(3) The partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust partnership assets.

(4) A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a partner based on a finding that partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of partnership assets is excessively burdensome, or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court’s equitable powers.

(5) Liability is imposed on the partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the partnership.

(e) This section applies to any partnership liability or obligation resulting from a representation by a partner or purported partner under Section 16308.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16308.

Except with respect to registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships:
